Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2147
Social work; multistate license; multistate authorization to practice.

(1) The department, with the recommendation of the board, shall issue multistate licenses to practice social work as provided in the Social Worker Licensure Compact.

(2) The department shall establish and collect fees for issuance of a multistate license as provided in sections 38-151 to 38-157.

(3) A person holding a multistate authorization to practice in Nebraska issued by another state under the Social Worker Licensure Compact may engage in the practice of social work in Nebraska as authorized pursuant to such compact.

(4) The board may approve, and the department may adopt and promulgate, rules and regulations as necessary to carry out this section.

Laws 2024, LB932, § 7.

Social Worker Licensure Compact, see section 38-4501.